California statutes. Labor Code
(b) If at any time the federal minimum wage applicable to employees covered by the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as amended, prior to February 1, 1967, is scheduled to exceed the minimum wage fixed by the commission, the provisions of Sections 1178 and 1178.5 pertaining to wage boards shall be waived and the commission shall, in a public meeting, adopt an order fixing a new minimum wage at the scheduled higher federal minimum wage. The effective date of such order shall be the same as the effective date of the federal minimum wage, and such order shall not become operative in the event the scheduled increase in the federal minimum wage does not become operative.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1083.)
-------------------------------------------

1182.1.

Any action taken by the commission pursuant to Sections 517 and 1182 shall be published in at least one newspaper in each of the Cities of Los Angeles, Sacramento, Oakland, San Jose, Fresno, San Diego, and San Francisco. A summary of the action taken and notice of where the complete text of the new or amended order may be obtained may be published in lieu of the complete text when the commission determines such summary and notice will adequately inform the public. The statement as to the basis of the order need not be published.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 134, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1182.4.

(a) No student employee, camp counselor, or program counselor of an organized camp shall be subject to a minimum wage or maximum hour order of the commission if the student employee, camp counselor, or program counselor receives a weekly salary of at least 85 percent of the minimum wage for a 40-hour week, regardless of the number of hours per week the student employee, camp counselor, or program counselor might work at the organized camp. If the student employee, camp counselor, or program counselor works less than 40 hours per week, the student employee, camp counselor, or program counselor shall be paid at least 85 percent of the minimum hourly wage for each hour worked.

(b) An organized camp may deduct the value of meals and lodging from the salary of a student employee, camp counselor, or program counselor pursuant to appropriate orders of the commission.

(c) As used in this section, “organized camp” means an organized camp, as defined in Section 18897 of the Health and Safety Code, which meets the standards of the American Camping Association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 379.)
-------------------------------------------

1182.5.

(a) The Legislature finds that the time permitted the Industrial Welfare Commission to consider daily overtime compensation petitions that are to be given priority attention by the commission pursuant to Section 20 of Chapter 1083 of the Statutes of 1980, has created unanticipated delays in the review and possible modification of applicable commission orders for preexisting workweek arrangements, as defined in subdivision (b). The Legislature finds further that legislation is necessary to provide redress of hardships resulting from these unanticipated delays by the enactment of special commission review procedures that augment, and do not limit in any way, the rights and privileges of parties before the Industrial Welfare Commission under this chapter.

(b) For purposes of this section only, a “preexisting workweek arrangement” is defined as, and limited to, a workweek arrangement that existed before November 1980, and had to be modified or abandoned by an employer because the workweek arrangement did not qualify for any exemption provided by the Industrial Welfare Commission from its daily overtime requirements for collectively bargained arrangements, and did not otherwise comply with the daily overtime requirements of an applicable commission order.

(c) An employer who has had in operation an established preexisting workweek arrangement may, prior to July 1, 1985, file a verified petition with the commission for review and modification of an applicable order and, upon filing this petition, shall simultaneously file a copy with the Labor Commissioner. Upon receipt of the petition by the Labor Commissioner a stay of enforcement of the applicable commission order as it would affect the workweek arrangement shall take effect. The Labor Commissioner may reject a petition that, on its face, cannot qualify as a preexisting workweek arrangement. Within three months of commencement of the stay the Labor Commissioner shall certify the preexisting workweek arrangement to the commission if, upon examination, the Labor Commissioner finds that all of the following conditions are met by the workweek arrangement:

(1) It was established by the petitioning employer and was in operation prior to November 1980.

(2) It had to be abandoned or modified by the employer because of noncompliance with the applicable order of the commission.

(3) It was established on a nondiscriminatory basis with the support of affected employees and it continues to have the support of two-thirds of the employees in the covered work group.

(4) It complied with all applicable standards of the commission, other than daily overtime requirements.

(5) It is found, after consultation with the Director of Industrial Relations when appropriate, not to be adverse to the health and welfare of affected employees.

In the course of examining a preexisting workweek arrangement and following certification, the Labor Commissioner shall not divert any of the resources of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement for the purpose of investigating, prosecuting, or otherwise acting upon any alleged violations of the daily overtime provisions of an applicable commission order during any period in 1980 in which a court-issued stay of enforcement was in effect for these provisions; provided, the workweek arrangement involved was in operation during that period in good faith reliance by the employer upon the court-issued stay of enforcement and with the approval of two-thirds of the employer’s affected employees.

(d) In the course of examining a petition for certification to the commission, the Labor Commissioner shall have access to all pertinent records of the petitioning employer and shall have the authority to converse with affected employees of the employer without the presence of management. Until the commission takes action on a petition, the Labor Commissioner shall retain the authority to withdraw a certification to the commission for cause.

(e) Upon receipt by the commission of the Labor Commissioner’s certification of a preexisting workweek arrangement, the stay of enforcement shall continue as hereinafter provided beyond the three-month period for certification until modified or rescinded by the commission. The modification or rescission shall not be made without an appropriate hearing and findings regarding the applicable order. If the commission undertakes review of the applicable order, the stay of enforcement shall continue through the review process and until any resulting modification of the applicable order, in which case, the modified order shall become applicable to the preexisting workweek arrangement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 869, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1182.6.

(a) No employer who continuously operates a manufacturing facility 24 hours a day for seven days a week, and who has had in operation an established preexisting workweek arrangement, as defined in subdivision (b), shall be in violation of this code or any applicable wage order of the commission by instituting, pursuant to an agreement voluntarily executed by the employer and at least two-thirds of the affected employees before the performance of the work, a regularly scheduled workweek that includes three working days of not more than 12 hours a day, or regularly scheduled workweeks that include three working days of not more than 12 hours a day one week and four working days of not more than 12 hours a day in the following week for an average workweek of 42 hours over a two-week period.

(b) For purposes of this section only, a “preexisting workweek arrangement” is defined as, and limited to, a workweek arrangement that existed before November 1980, and had to be modified or abandoned by an employer because the workweek arrangement did not qualify for any exemption provided by the Industrial Welfare Commission from its daily overtime requirements for collectively bargained arrangements, and did not otherwise comply with the daily overtime requirements of an applicable commission order.

(c) The agreement described in subdivision (a) shall be confirmed by an affirmative vote by secret ballot by at least two-thirds of the affected employees, and may be rescinded at any time by a two-thirds vote of the affected employees. A new vote on whether the agreement described in subdivision (a) shall be continued shall be held every three years, and an affirmative vote by at least two-thirds of the affected employees shall be necessary to continue the agreement.

(d) The employer shall not be required to pay premium wage rates to employees working a schedule described in subdivision (a) unless the employee is required or permitted to work more than 12 hours in any workday, more than the scheduled three or four days in any workweek, or more than 40 hours in any workweek.

(e) This section shall not apply to any employer who is now, or in the future becomes, a party to a collective-bargaining agreement covering employees who would otherwise be covered by this section.

(f) No employee working a schedule described in subdivision (a) shall be required to work more than four consecutive days within seven consecutive days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 482.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1182.7.

(a) The Legislature finds that the time permitted the Industrial Welfare Commission to consider petitions, including, but not limited to, daily overtime compensation petitions that are to be given priority attention by the commission pursuant to Section 20 of Chapter 1083 of the Statutes of 1980, has created unanticipated and unwarranted delays in the review and possible modification of applicable commission orders. The Legislature finds further that legislation is necessary to provide redress of hardships resulting from these delays by the enactment of special commission review procedures that augment, and do not limit in any way, the rights and privileges of parties before the Industrial Welfare Commission under this chapter.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary, if a labor organization or a trade association recognized in the health care industry files or has filed a petition with the commission that requests an amendment to an order of the commission that would directly regulate only the health care industry, the petitioner may request that the ordinary procedure established by this chapter for the review of petitions of this nature not be used and that the procedure specified in subdivisions (c) and (d) be followed instead. If the request is made by the petitioner, the commission shall be required to follow the procedure specified in subdivisions (c) and (d).

(c) Upon the filing of a request under subdivision (b), the procedure to revise an order of the commission provided in Sections 1178 to 1182, inclusive, shall be waived. In lieu of that procedure, the commission shall propose the adoption of or may reject the petition, in whole or in part, without appointing a wage board. The commission shall act on the petition within 45 days of the date the petition is originally filed. If the commission rejects the petition, it shall state its reasons for rejection.

The commission shall thereafter conduct hearings on any proposal to adopt the petition in whole or in part in the manner specified in subdivision (c) of Section 1178.5 and publish the proposed action in the manner provided in Section 1181. However, the hearings shall be conducted within 90 days of the date the petition is originally filed.

(d) Not more than 30 days following the hearings specified in subdivision (c), the commission shall take final action with respect to its proposal. No later than 15 days following final action, notice of the action taken shall be given in the manner provided for in Sections 1182.1 and 1183. Any action adopting, amending, or repealing an order of the commission pursuant to this section shall take effect 60 days following the date of this notice.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the commission shall not adopt, amend, or repeal a proposal which has been changed from that which has originally been made available to the public, unless the change is nonsubstantive in nature and the commission complies with the procedure specified in this subdivision.

If a substantive change is made to the original proposal after the close of the public hearing, the full text of the resulting change shall be noticed within five days and made available to the public for comments for at least 10 days before the commission adopts, amends, or repeals the regulation. No later than 10 days following the close of the public comment period, the commission shall take final action with respect to its modified proposal, and give notice of that action within 10 days in the manner provided in Sections 1182.1 and 1183. In no case shall any action adopting, amending, or repealing an order take effect more than 60 days following the close of the public comment period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1182.8.

No employer shall be in violation of any provision of any applicable order of the Industrial Welfare Commission relating to credit or charges for lodging for charging, pursuant to a voluntary written agreement, a resident apartment manager up to two-thirds of the fair market rental value of the apartment supplied to the manager, if no credit for the apartment is used to meet the employer’s minimum wage obligation to the manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 913, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1182.11.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, on and after March 1, 1997, the minimum wage for all industries shall not be less than five dollars ($5.00) per hour; on and after March 1, 1998, the minimum wage for all industries shall not be less than five dollars and seventy-five cents ($5.75) per hour. The Industrial Welfare Commission shall, at a public meeting, adopt minimum wage orders consistent with this section without convening wage boards, which wage orders shall be final and conclusive for all purposes.

(History: Added November 5, 1996, by initiative Proposition 210, Sec. 2.   Note: Prop. 210 is titled the Living Wage Act of 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1182.12.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, on and after July 1, 2014, the minimum wage for all industries shall be not less than nine dollars ($9) per hour, and on and after January 1, 2016, the minimum wage for all industries shall be not less than ten dollars ($10) per hour.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the minimum wage for all industries shall not be less than the amounts set forth in this subdivision, except when the scheduled increases in paragraphs (1) and (2) are temporarily suspended under subdivision (d).

(1) For any employer who employs 26 or more employees, the minimum wage shall be as follows:

(A) From January 1, 2017, to December 31, 2017, inclusive,—ten dollars and fifty cents ($10.50) per hour.

(B) From January 1, 2018, to December 31, 2018, inclusive,—eleven dollars ($11) per hour.

(C) From January 1, 2019, to December 31, 2019, inclusive,—twelve dollars ($12) per hour.

(D) From January 1, 2020, to December 31, 2020, inclusive,—thirteen dollars ($13) per hour.

(E) From January 1, 2021, to December 31, 2021, inclusive,—fourteen dollars ($14) per hour.

(F) From January 1, 2022, and until adjusted by subdivision (c)—fifteen dollars ($15) per hour.

(2) For any employer who employs 25 or fewer employees, the minimum wage shall be as follows:

(A) From January 1, 2018, to December 31, 2018, inclusive,—ten dollars and fifty cents ($10.50) per hour.

(B) From January 1, 2019, to December 31, 2019, inclusive,—eleven dollars ($11) per hour.

(C) From January 1, 2020, to December 31, 2020, inclusive,—twelve dollars ($12) per hour.

(D) From January 1, 2021, to December 31, 2021, inclusive,—thirteen dollars ($13) per hour.

(E) From January 1, 2022, to December 31, 2022, inclusive,—fourteen dollars ($14) per hour.

(F) From January 1, 2023, and until adjusted by
 subdivision (c)—fifteen dollars ($15) per hour.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “employer” means any person who directly or indirectly, or through an agent or any other person, employs or exercises control over the wages, hours, or working conditions of any person. For purposes of this subdivision, “employer” includes the state, political subdivisions of the state, and municipalities.

(4) Employees who are treated as employed by a single qualified taxpayer under subdivision (h) of Section 23626 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, as it read on the effective date of this section, shall be considered employees of that taxpayer for purposes of this subdivision.

(c) (1) Following the implementation of the minimum wage increase specified in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), on
 or before August 1 of that year, and on or before each August 1 thereafter, the Director of Finance shall calculate an adjusted minimum wage. The calculation shall increase the minimum wage by the lesser of 3.5 percent and the rate of change in the averages of the most recent July 1 to June 30, inclusive, period over the preceding July 1 to June 30, inclusive, period for the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics nonseasonally adjusted United States Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers (U.S. CPI-W). The result shall be rounded to the nearest ten cents ($0.10). Each adjusted minimum wage increase calculated under this subdivision shall take effect on the following January 1.

(2) If the rate of change in the averages of the most recent July 1 to June 30, inclusive, period over the preceding July 1 to June 30, inclusive, period for the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics nonseasonally adjusted U.S. CPI-W is
 negative, there shall be no increase or decrease in the minimum wage pursuant to this subdivision on the following January 1.

(3) (A) Notwithstanding the implementation timing described in paragraph (1) of this subdivision, if the rate of change in the averages of the most recent July 1 to June 30, inclusive, period over the preceding July 1 to June 30, inclusive, period for the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics nonseasonally adjusted U.S. CPI-W exceeds 7 percent in the first year that the minimum wage specified in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) is implemented, the indexing provisions described in paragraph (1) of this subdivision shall be implemented immediately, such that the indexing will be effective on the following January 1.

(B) If the rate of change in the averages of the most recent July 1 to June 30, inclusive, period
 over the preceding July 1 to June 30, inclusive, period for the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics nonseasonally adjusted U.S. CPI-W exceeds 7 percent in the first year that the minimum wage specified in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) is implemented, notwithstanding any other law, for employers with 25 or fewer employees the minimum wage shall be set equal to the minimum wage for employers with 26 or more employees, effective on the following January 1, and the minimum wage increase specified in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall be considered to have been implemented for purposes of this subdivision.

(d) (1) On or before July 28, 2017, and on or before every July 28 thereafter until the minimum wage is fifteen dollars ($15) per hour pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), to ensure that economic conditions can support a minimum wage increase, the Director of
 Finance shall annually make a determination and certify to the Governor and the Legislature whether each of the following conditions is met:

(A) Total nonfarm employment for California, seasonally adjusted, decreased over the three-month period from April to June, inclusive, prior to the July 28 determination. This calculation shall compare seasonally adjusted total nonfarm employment in June to seasonally adjusted total nonfarm employment in March, as reported by the Employment Development Department.

(B) Total nonfarm employment for California, seasonally adjusted, decreased over the six-month period from January to June, inclusive, prior to the July 28 determination. This calculation shall compare seasonally adjusted total nonfarm employment in June to seasonally adjusted total nonfarm employment in December, as reported by the Employment Development Department.

(C) Retail sales and use tax cash receipts from a 3.9375-percent tax rate for the July 1 to June 30, inclusive, period ending one month prior to the July 28 determination is less than retail sales and use tax cash receipts from a 3.9375-percent tax rate for the July 1 to June 30, inclusive, period ending 13 months prior to the July 28 determination. The calculation for the condition specified in this subparagraph shall be made as follows:

(i) The State Board of Equalization shall publish by the 10th of each month on its Internet Web site the total retail sales (sales before adjustments) for the prior month derived from their daily retail sales and use tax reports.

(ii) The State Board of Equalization shall publish by the 10th of each month on its Internet Web site the monthly factor required to convert the prior month’s
 retail sales and use tax total from all tax rates to a retail sales and use tax total from a 3.9375-percent tax rate.

(iii) The Department of Finance shall multiply the monthly total from clause (i) by the monthly factor from clause (ii) for each month.

(iv) The Department of Finance shall sum the monthly totals calculated in clause (iii) to calculate the 12-month July 1 to June 30, inclusive, totals needed for the comparison in this subparagraph.

(2) (A) On or before July 28, 2017, and on or before every July 28 thereafter until the minimum wage is fifteen dollars ($15) per hour pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), to ensure that the state General Fund fiscal condition can support the next scheduled minimum wage increase, the Director of Finance shall annually make a determination and
 certify to the Governor and the Legislature whether the state General Fund would be in a deficit in the current fiscal year, or in either of the following two fiscal years.

(B) For purposes of this subdivision, deficit is defined as a negative balance in the Special Fund for Economic Uncertainties, as provided for in Section 16418 of the Government Code, that exceeds, in absolute value, 1 percent of total state General Fund revenue and transfers, based on the most recent Department of Finance estimates required by Section 12.5 of Article IV of the California Constitution. For purposes of this subdivision, the estimates shall include the assumption that only the minimum wage increases scheduled for the following calendar year pursuant to subdivision (b) will be implemented.

(3) (A) (i) If, for any year, the condition in either
 subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) is met, and if the condition in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) is met, the Governor may, on or before August 1 of that year, notify the Legislature of an initial determination to temporarily suspend the minimum wage increases scheduled pursuant to subdivision (b) for the following year.

(ii) If the Director of Finance certifies under paragraph (2) that the state General Fund would be in a deficit in the current fiscal year, or in either of the following two fiscal years, the Governor may, on or before August 1 of that fiscal year, notify the Legislature of an initial determination to temporarily suspend the minimum wage increases scheduled pursuant to subdivision (b) for the following year.

(B) If the Governor provides notice to the Legislature pursuant to subparagraph (A), the Governor shall, on September 1 of any such year, make a
 final determination whether to temporarily suspend the minimum wage increases scheduled pursuant to subdivision (b) for the following year. The determination to temporarily suspend the minimum wage increases scheduled pursuant to subdivision (b) for the following year shall be made by proclamation.

(C) The Governor may temporarily suspend scheduled minimum wage increases pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) no more than two times.

(D) If the Governor makes a final determination to temporarily suspend the scheduled minimum wage increases pursuant to subdivision (b) for the following year, all dates specified in subdivision (b) that are subsequent to the September 1 final determination date shall be postponed by an additional year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 4, Sec. 3.   (SB 3)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1182.13.

(a) The Department of Industrial Relations shall adjust upwards the permissible meals and lodging credits by the same percentage as the increase in the minimum wage made pursuant to Section 1182.12.

(b) The Department of Industrial Relations shall amend and republish the Industrial Welfare Commission’s wage orders to be consistent with this section and Section 1182.12. The department shall make no other changes to the wage orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission that are in existence on the effective date of this section. The department shall meet the requirements set forth in Section 1183.

(c) Every employer that is subject to an amended republished order under this section shall post a copy of the order and keep it posted in a conspicuous location frequented by employees during the hours of the workday as required by Section 1183.

(d) Wage orders that are amended and republished as required under this section shall be final and conclusive for all purposes and dispositive of all pending petitions before the Industrial Welfare Commission as of the effective date of the act adding this section. Any amendment and republication pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and from the procedures set forth in Sections 1177, 1178.5, 1181, 1182, and 1182.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 230, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1182.14.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(1) Workers in the health care industry, including workers at general acute care hospitals, acute psychiatric hospitals, medical offices and clinics, behavioral health centers, and residential care centers provide vital health care services to California residents, including emergency care, labor and delivery, cancer treatments, and primary and specialty care. Similarly, dialysis clinics provide life-preserving care to patients with end-stage renal disease and are part of the continuum of kidney care that also includes hospitals and health systems. Residents and visitors to the state rely on access to this high-quality health care.

(2) Higher wages
 are an important means of retaining an experienced workforce and attracting new workers. A stable workforce benefits patients and improves quality of care.

(3) Employers across multiple industries are raising wages. The health care sector in California must offer higher wages to remain competitive.

(4) Members of the health care team such as certified nursing assistants, patient aides, technicians, and food service workers, among many others, are essential to both routine medical care and emergency response efforts.

(5) Even before the COVID-19 pandemic, California was facing an urgent and immediate shortage of health care workers, adversely impacting the health and well-being of Californians, especially economically disadvantaged Californians. The pandemic has worsened these shortages. Higher wages are needed to
 attract and retain health care workers to treat patients, including being prepared to provide necessary care in an emergency.

(6) The Legislature finds and declares that laws that establish, require, impose, limit or otherwise relate to wages, salary, or compensation affect access to quality health care for all residents of, and visitors to, the state provided by licensed health care facilities, which serve as a critical part of the state’s ability to respond to catastrophic emergencies. The Legislature also finds and declares that the time limitations and other provisions established by this section are necessary to stabilize the health care system following the state and federal public health emergencies related to COVID-19, the closure and bankruptcy of licensed health care facilities, and the reduction in vital services by licensed health care facilities due to financial distress and the health care workforce crisis that has resulted in
 staffing shortages and strain for health care workers. The Legislature further finds and declares that access to quality health care and the stability of the health care system is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, this section occupies the whole field of wages, salary, or compensation for covered health care facility employees, and applies to all cities and counties, including charter cities, charter counties, and charter cities and counties during the stabilization period provided by this section.

(7) The Legislature finds and declares that it is the intent of the Legislature that subclause (I) of clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) is declarative of existing law.

(b) As used in this section:

(1) “Adjusted patient days” means the total gross patient revenue, divided by gross revenue provided for inpatient services, multiplied by the number of patient days.

(2) (A) “Covered health care employee” means any of the following:

(i) An employee of a health care facility employer who provides patient care, health care services, or services supporting the provision of health care, which includes, but is not limited to, employees performing work in the occupation of a nurse, physician, caregiver, medical resident, intern or fellow, patient care technician, janitor, housekeeping staff person, groundskeeper, guard, clerical worker, nonmanagerial administrative worker, food service worker, gift shop worker, technical and ancillary services worker, medical coding and medical billing personnel,
 scheduler, call center and warehouse worker, and laundry worker, regardless of formal job title.

(ii) A contracted or subcontracted employee described in subparagraph (B).

(B) “Covered health care employee” includes a contracted or subcontracted employee, if clauses (i) and (ii) apply:

(i) The employee’s employer contracts with the covered health care facility employer, or with a contractor or subcontractor to the covered health care facility employer, to provide health care services, or services supporting the provision of health care.

(ii) (I) Consistent with the definitions of “employ” and “employer” in the Industrial Welfare Commission wage orders, the covered health care facility employer directly or indirectly, or through an
 agent or any other person, engages, suffers, or permits an employee to work, or exercises control over the employee’s wages, hours or working conditions, or

(II) The employee performs contracted or subcontracted work primarily on the premises of a covered health care facility. For purposes of this subparagraph, “primarily” means more than one-half of the employee’s work time during a workweek.

(iii) A contracted or subcontracted employee shall be paid the applicable minimum wage in this section for all hours worked providing patient care, health care services, or services supporting the provision of health care.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), “covered health care employee” does not include:

(i) Employment as an outside salesperson.

(ii) Any work performed by a public employee where the public employee is not primarily engaged in services described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) performed for a covered health care facility. For purposes of this subparagraph, “primarily” means more than one-half of the employee’s work time during a workweek.

(iii) Delivery or waste collection work on the premises of a covered health care facility, provided that the delivery or waste collection worker is not an employee of any person that owns, controls, or operates a covered health care facility.

(iv) Medical transportation services in or out of a covered health care facility, provided that the medical transportation services worker is not an employee of any person that owns, controls, or operates a covered health care facility.

(3) (A) “Covered health care facility” means any of the following:

(i) A facility or other work site that is part of an integrated health care delivery system.

(ii) A licensed general acute care hospital, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, including a distinct part of any such hospital.

(iii) A licensed acute psychiatric hospital, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, including a distinct part of any such hospital.

(iv) A special hospital, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(v) A
 licensed skilled nursing facility, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, if owned, operated, or controlled by a hospital or integrated health care delivery system or health care system.

(vi) A patient’s home when health care services are delivered by an entity owned or operated by a general acute care hospital or acute psychiatric hospital.

(vii) A licensed home health agency, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1727 of the Health and Safety Code.

(viii) A clinic, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code, including a specialty care clinic, or a dialysis clinic.

(ix) A psychology clinic, as defined in Section 1204.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(x) A clinic as defined in subdivision (d), (g), or (l) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.

(xi) A licensed residential care facility for the elderly, as defined in Section 1569.2 of the Health and Safety Code, if affiliated with an acute care provider or owned, operated, or controlled by a general acute care hospital, acute psychiatric hospital, or the parent entity of a general acute care hospital or acute psychiatric hospital.

(xii) A psychiatric health facility, as defined in Section 1250.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(xiii) A mental health rehabilitation center, as defined in Section 5675 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(xiv) A community clinic licensed under
 subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code, an intermittent clinic exempt from licensure under subdivision (h) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, or a clinic operated by any political subdivisions of the state, including the University of California or a city or county that is exempt from licensure under subdivision (b) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.

(xv) A rural health clinic, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (l) of Section 1396d of Title 42 of the United States Code, that is not license exempt.

(xvi) An urgent care clinic.

(xvii) An ambulatory surgical center that is certified to participate in the Medicare Program under Title XVIII (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq.) of the federal Social Security Act.

(xviii) A physician group.

(xix) A county correctional facility that provides health care services.

(xx) A county mental health facility.

(B) “Covered health care facility” does not include either of the following:

(i) Any health care facility described in subparagraph (A) that is owned, controlled, or operated by the state or any state agency of the executive branch. As used in this subparagraph, “state agency” includes every state office, officer, department, division, bureau, board, and commission under the executive branch, including any constitutional offices or officers, California State University, or California Community College, but does not include a health care district or the University of California.

(ii) A tribal clinic exempt from licensure under subdivision (c) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, or an outpatient setting conducted, maintained, or operated by a federally recognized Indian tribe, tribal organization, or urban Indian organization, as defined in Section 1603 of Title 25 of the United States Code.

(4) “Employ” means to engage, suffer, or permit to work.

(5) “Employee” means any person employed by an employer.

(6) “Employer” means a person who directly or indirectly, or through an agent or any other person, employs or exercises control over the wages, hours, or working conditions of any person. “Employer” includes political subdivisions of the state, health care districts, the University of California, and municipalities.

(7) “Full-time equivalent employee” means the total paid hours at a covered health care facility, including an integrated health care delivery system, as of January 1, 2022,, divided by 2,080. The number of full-time equivalent employees shall be determined as follows:

(A) The number of full-time equivalent employees shall be as detailed in the Department of Health Care Access and Information’s 2021 Pivot Table – Hospital Annual Selected File (April 2023 Extract) and published online at https://data.chhs.ca.gov/dataset/hospital-annual-financial-data-selected-data-pivot-tables. For purposes of determining the number of full-time equivalent employees under this subparagraph, published data in the pivot table shall be aggregated to determine the total full-time equivalent employees for an integrated health care delivery system or health system. As provided by paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (c), any covered health care facility employer that is part of these systems shall be subject to the minimum wage schedule described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(B) Any covered health care facility employer that does not report the data referenced in subparagraph (A), but had 10,000 or more full-time equivalent employees as of January 1, 2022, shall be subject to the minimum wage schedule described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c). For the purposes of this paragraph, “full-time equivalent employees” means the total number of paid hours at a nonreporting covered health care facility employer divided by 2,080. This subparagraph does not apply to county entities, except as counties that are specifically covered in subdivision (c).

(8) “Health care services” means patient care-related services including nursing; caregiving; services provided by medical